Washington statutes.
RCW 36.58.130

Solid waste disposal district—Powers—Restrictions—Fees.

A solid waste disposal district may provide for all aspects of disposing of solid wastes. All moneys received by a solid waste disposal district shall be used exclusively for district purposes. Nothing in this chapter shall permit waste disposal districts to engage in the collection of residential or commercial garbage.

A solid waste disposal district shall perform all construction in excess of twenty-five thousand dollars by contract let pursuant to RCW 36.32.250.

A solid waste disposal district may collect disposal fees based exclusively upon utilization by weight or volume for accepting solid wastes at a disposal site or transfer station. The county may transfer moneys to a solid waste disposal district to be used for district purposes.

[ 1982 c 175 s 4.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 175: See note following RCW 36.58.100.